California statutes. Penal Code
(5) The defendant is not being placed into a diversion program, pursuant to this section, for any serious felony as described in Section 1192.7 or 1192.8 or violent felony as described in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(6) The defendant is not being placed into a diversion program pursuant to this section for a crime alleged to have been committed against a person for whom the defendant is the primary caregiver.

(e) The provider of the pretrial diversion services in which the defendant has been placed shall provide regular reports to the court, the defense, and the prosecutor on the defendant’s progress in the programming.

(f) (1) If it appears to the prosecuting attorney, the court, pretrial services,
 or the probation department that the defendant is performing unsatisfactorily in the assigned program, or if the defendant is, subsequent to entering the program, convicted of a felony or any offense that reflects a propensity for violence, the prosecuting attorney or the probation department may make a motion to reinstate criminal proceedings. The court may also reinstate criminal proceedings on its own motion.

(2) After notice to the defendant, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether to reinstate criminal
 proceedings.

(3) If the court finds that the defendant is not performing satisfactorily in the assigned program, or the court finds that the defendant has been convicted of a crime as indicated in paragraph (1), the court may end the diversion program and order the resumption of criminal proceedings.

(g) If the defendant has performed satisfactorily in diversion, at the end of the period of diversion, the court shall dismiss the defendant’s criminal charges that were the subject of the criminal proceedings at the time of the initial diversion. A court may conclude that the defendant has performed satisfactorily if the defendant has substantially complied with the requirements of diversion, and has avoided significant new violations of law. If the court dismisses the charges, the clerk of the court shall file a record with the Department of Justice indicating the disposition of the case diverted pursuant to this section. Upon successful completion of diversion, if the court dismisses the charges, the arrest upon which the diversion was based shall be deemed never to have occurred, and the court shall order access to the record of the arrest restricted in accordance with Section 1001.9,
 except as specified in subdivision
 (i). The defendant who successfully completes diversion may indicate in response to any question concerning the defendant’s prior criminal record that they were not arrested or diverted for the offense, except as specified in subdivision (i).

(h) A record pertaining to an arrest resulting in successful completion of diversion, or any record generated as a result of the defendant’s
 application for or participation in diversion, shall not, without the defendant’s consent, be used in any way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate.

(i) The defendant shall be advised that, regardless of the defendant’s completion of diversion, both of the following apply:

(1) The arrest upon which the diversion was based may be disclosed by the Department of Justice to any peace officer application request and that, notwithstanding subdivision
 (h), this section does not relieve the defendant of the obligation to disclose the arrest in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for a position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(2) An order to seal records pertaining to an arrest made pursuant to this section has no effect on a criminal justice agency’s ability to access and use those sealed records and information regarding sealed arrests, as described in Section 851.92.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.   (SB 394)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.92. Law Enforcement Assisted Diversion (LEAD) Pilot Program [1001.85. - 1001.88.]

1001.85.

(a) The Law Enforcement Assisted Diversion (LEAD) pilot program is hereby established. The purpose of the LEAD program is to improve public safety and reduce recidivism by increasing the availability and use of social service resources while reducing costs to law enforcement agencies and courts stemming from repeated incarceration.

(b) LEAD pilot programs shall be consistent with the following principles, implemented to address and reflect the priorities of the community in which the program exists:

(1) Providing intensive case management services and an individually tailored intervention plan that acts as a blueprint for assisting LEAD
 participants.

(2) Prioritizing temporary and permanent housing that includes individualized supportive services, without preconditions of drug or alcohol treatment or abstinence from drugs or alcohol.

(3) Employing human and social service resources in coordination with law enforcement in a manner that improves individual outcomes and community safety, and promotes community wellness.

(4) Participation in LEAD services shall be voluntary throughout the duration of the program and shall not require abstinence from drug or alcohol use as a condition of continued participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 17.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.86.

(a) The LEAD program shall be administered by the Board of State and Community Corrections.

(b) The board shall award grants, on a competitive basis, to up to three jurisdictions as authorized by this chapter. The board shall establish minimum standards, funding schedules, and procedures for awarding grants, which shall take into consideration, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Information from the applicant demonstrating a clear understanding of the program’s purpose and the applicant’s willingness and ability to implement the LEAD program as described in this chapter.

(2) Key local partners who would be committed to, and involved in, the development and successful implementation of a LEAD program, including, but not limited to, balanced representation from law enforcement agencies, prosecutorial agencies, public defenders and defense counsel, public health and social services agencies, case management service providers, and any other entities identified by the applicant as integral to the successful implementation of a LEAD program in the jurisdiction.

(3) The jurisdiction’s capacity and commitment to coordinate social services, law enforcement efforts, and justice system decisionmaking processes, and to work to ensure that the discretionary decisions made by each participant in the administration of the program operates in a manner consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Successful grant applicants shall collect and
 maintain data pertaining to the effectiveness of the program as indicated by the board in the request for proposals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 17.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.87.

(a) LEAD programs funded pursuant to this chapter shall consist of a strategy of effective intervention for eligible participants consistent with the following gateways to services:

(1) Prebooking referral. As an alternative to arrest, a law enforcement officer may take or refer a person for whom the officer has probable cause for arrest for any of the offenses in subdivision (b) to a case manager to be screened for immediate crisis services and to schedule a complete assessment intake interview. Participation in LEAD shall be voluntary, and the person may decline to participate in the program at any time. Criminal charges based on the conduct for which a person is diverted to LEAD shall not be filed, provided that the person finishes the complete assessment
 intake interview within a period set by the local jurisdictional partners, but not to exceed 30 days after the referral.

(2) Social contact referral. A law enforcement officer may refer an individual to LEAD whom he or she believes is at high risk of arrest in the future for any of the crimes specified in subdivision (b), provided that the individual meets the criteria specified in this paragraph and expresses interest in voluntarily participating in the program. LEAD may accept these referrals if the program has capacity after responding to prebooking diversion referrals described in paragraph (1). All social contact referrals to LEAD shall meet the following criteria:

(A) Verification by law enforcement that the individual has had prior involvement with low-level drug activity or prostitution. Verification shall consist of any of the following:

(i) Criminal history records, including, but not limited to, prior police reports, arrests, jail bookings, criminal charges, or convictions indicating that he or she was engaged in low-level drug or prostitution activity.

(ii) Law enforcement has directly observed the individual’s low-level drug or prostitution activity on prior occasions.

(iii) Law enforcement has a reliable basis of information to believe that the individual is engaged in low-level drug or prostitution activity, including, but not limited to, information provided by another first responder, a professional, or a credible community member.

(B) The individual’s prior involvement with low-level drug or prostitution activity occurred within the LEAD pilot program area.

(C) The individual’s prior involvement with low-level drug or prostitution activity occurred within 24 months of the date of referral.

(D) The individual does not have a pending case in drug court or mental health court.

(E) The individual is not prohibited, by means of an existing no-contact order, temporary restraining order, or antiharassment order, from making contact with a current LEAD participant.

(b) The following offenses are eligible for either prebooking diversion, social contact referral, or both:

(1) Possession for sale or transfer of a controlled substance or other prohibited substance where the circumstances indicate that the sale or transfer is intended to provide a
 subsistence living or to allow the person to obtain or afford drugs for his or her own consumption.

(2) Sale or transfer of a controlled substance or other prohibited substance where the circumstances indicate that the sale or transfer is intended to provide a subsistence living or to allow the person to obtain or afford drugs for his or her own consumption.

(3) Possession of a controlled substance or other prohibited substance.

(4) Being under the influence of a controlled substance or other prohibited substance.

(5) Being under the influence of alcohol and a controlled substance or other prohibited substance.

(6) Prostitution pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 647.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 186.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.88.

(a) Services provided pursuant to this chapter may include, but are not limited to, case management, housing, medical care, mental health care, treatment for alcohol or substance use disorders, nutritional counseling and treatment, psychological counseling, employment, employment training and education, civil legal services, and system navigation. Grant funding may be used to support any of the following:

(1) Project management and community engagement.

(2) Temporary services and treatment necessary to stabilize a participant’s condition, including necessary housing.

(3) Outreach and direct service costs for services described in this section.

(4) Civil legal services for LEAD participants.

(5) Dedicated prosecutorial resources, including for coordinating any nondiverted criminal cases of LEAD participants.

(6) Dedicated law enforcement resources, including for overtime required for participation in operational meetings and training.

(7) Training and technical assistance from experts in the implementation of LEAD in other jurisdictions.

(8) Collecting and maintaining the data necessary for program evaluation.

(b) (1) The board shall contract with a
 nonprofit research entity, university, or college to evaluate the effectiveness of the LEAD program. The evaluation design shall include measures to assess the cost-benefit outcomes of LEAD programs compared to booking and prosecution, and may include evaluation elements such as comparing outcomes for LEAD participants to similarly situated offenders who are arrested and booked, the number of jail bookings, total number of jail days, the prison incarceration rate, subsequent felony and misdemeanor arrests or convictions, and costs to the criminal justice and court systems. Savings will be compared to costs of LEAD participation. By January 1, 2020, a report of the findings shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report pursuant to this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2024, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(c) The board may contract with experts in the implementation of LEAD in other jurisdictions for the purpose of providing technical assistance to participating jurisdictions.

(d) The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund for the LEAD pilot program authorized in this chapter. The board may spend up to five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000) of the amount appropriated in this subdivision for the contracts authorized in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 17.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.95. Diversion Restitution Fee [1001.90. - 1001.90.]

1001.90.

(a) For all persons charged with a felony or misdemeanor whose case is diverted by the court pursuant to this title, the court shall impose on the defendant a diversion restitution fee in addition to any other administrative fee provided or imposed under the law. This fee shall not be imposed upon persons whose case is diverted by the court pursuant to Chapter 2.8 (commencing with Section 1001.20).

(b) The diversion restitution fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be set at the discretion of the court and shall be commensurate with the seriousness of the offense, but shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100), and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) The diversion restitution fee shall be ordered regardless of the defendant’s present ability to pay. However, if the court finds that there are compelling and extraordinary reasons, the court may waive imposition of the fee. When the waiver is granted, the court shall state on the record all reasons supporting the waiver. Except as provided in this subdivision, the court shall impose the separate and additional diversion restitution fee required by this section.

(d) In setting the amount of the diversion restitution fee in excess of the one hundred dollar ($100) minimum, the court shall consider any relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the defendant’s ability to pay, the seriousness and gravity of the offense and the circumstances of its commission, any economic gain derived by the defendant as a result of the crime, and the extent to which any other person suffered any losses as a result of the crime. Those losses
 may include pecuniary losses to the victim or the victim’s dependents as well as intangible losses, such as psychological harm caused by the crime. Consideration of a defendant’s ability to pay may include the defendant’s future earning capacity. A defendant shall bear the burden of demonstrating the lack of the defendant’s ability to pay. Express findings by the court as to the factors bearing on the amount of the fee shall not be required. A separate hearing for the diversion restitution fee shall not be required.

(e) The court shall not limit the ability of the state to enforce the fee imposed by this section in the manner of a judgment in a civil action. The court shall not modify the amount of this fee except to correct an error in the setting of the amount of the fee imposed.

(f) The fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be immediately deposited in the Restitution Fund
 for use pursuant to Section 13967 of the Government Code.

(g) As used in this section, “diversion” also means deferred entry of judgment pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1000).

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 257, Sec. 18.   (AB 177)   Effective September 23, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.96. Court Initiated Misdemeanor Diversion [1001.95. - 1001.97.]

1001.95.

(a) A judge in the superior court in which a misdemeanor is being prosecuted may, at the judge’s discretion, and over the objection of a prosecuting attorney, offer diversion to a defendant pursuant to these provisions.

(b) A judge may continue a diverted case for a period not to exceed 24 months and order the defendant to comply with terms, conditions, or programs that the judge deems appropriate based on the defendant’s specific situation.

(c) If the defendant has complied with the imposed terms and conditions, at the end of the period of diversion, the judge shall dismiss the action against the defendant.

(d) If it appears to the
 court that the defendant is not complying with the terms and conditions of diversion, after notice to the defendant, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the criminal proceedings should be reinstituted. If the court finds that the defendant has not complied with the terms and conditions of diversion, the court may end the diversion and order resumption of the criminal proceedings.

(e) A defendant may not be offered diversion pursuant to this section for any of the following current charged offenses:

(1) Any offense for which a person, if convicted, would be required to register pursuant to Section 290.

(2) Any offense involving domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code or subdivision (b) of Section 13700 of this code.

(3) A violation of Section 646.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 6.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.96.

A defendant who is diverted pursuant to this chapter shall be required to complete all of the following in order to have their action dismissed:

(a) Complete all conditions ordered by the court.

(b) Make full restitution. However, a defendant’s inability to pay restitution due to indigence shall not be grounds for denial of diversion or a finding that the defendant has failed to comply with the terms of diversion.

(c) Comply with a court-ordered protective order, stay-away order, or order prohibiting firearm possession, if
 applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   (AB 3234)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.97.

(a) Upon successful completion of the terms, conditions, or programs ordered by the court pursuant to Section 1001.95, the arrest upon which diversion was imposed shall be deemed to have never occurred. The defendant may indicate in response to any question concerning their prior criminal record that they were not arrested. A record pertaining to an arrest resulting in successful completion of the terms, conditions, or programs ordered by the court shall not, without the defendant’s consent, be used in any way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate.

(b) The defendant shall be advised that, regardless of their successful
 completion of diversion, the arrest upon which the diversion was based may be disclosed by the Department of Justice in response to a peace officer application request and that, notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not relieve them of the obligation to disclose the arrest in response to a direct question contained in a questionnaire or application for a position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.   (AB 3234)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Demurrer and Amendment [1002. - 1012.]

1002.

The only pleading on the part of the defendant is either a demurrer or a plea.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

Both the demurrer and plea must be put in, in open Court, either at the time of the arraignment or at such other time as may be allowed to the defendant for that purpose.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.

The defendant may demur to the accusatory pleading at any time prior to the entry of a plea, when it appears upon the face thereof either:

(a) If an indictment, that the grand jury by which it was found had no legal authority to inquire into the offense charged, or, if any information or complaint that the court has no jurisdiction of the offense charged therein.

(b) That it does not substantially conform to the provisions of Sections 950 and 952, and also Section 951 in case of an indictment or information.

(c) That more than one offense is
 charged, except as provided in Section 954.

(d) That the facts stated do not constitute a public offense.

(e) That it contains matter which, if true, would constitute a legal justification or excuse of the offense charged, or other legal bar to the prosecution.

(f) That the statutory provision alleged in the accusatory pleading is constitutionally invalid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 7.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.

The demurrer must be in writing, signed either by the defendant or his counsel, and filed. It must distinctly specify the grounds of objection to the accusatory pleading or it must be disregarded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.

Upon the demurrer being filed, the argument upon the objections presented thereby must be heard immediately, unless for exceptional cause shown, the court shall grant a continuance. Such continuance shall be for no longer time than the ends of justice require, and the court shall enter in its minutes the facts requiring it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1927, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

1007.

Upon considering the demurrer, the court must make an order either overruling or sustaining it. If the demurrer to an indictment or information is overruled, the court must permit the defendant, at the defendant’s election, to plead, which the defendant must do forthwith, unless the court extends the time. If the demurrer is sustained, the court must, if the defect can be remedied by amendment, permit the indictment or information to be amended, either forthwith or within such time, not exceeding 10 days, as it may fix, or, if the defect or insufficiency therein cannot be remedied by amendment, the court may direct the filing of a new information or the submission of the case to the same or another grand jury. If the demurrer to a complaint is sustained, the court must, if the defect can be remedied, permit the filing of an amended complaint within such time not exceeding 10 days as it may fix. The orders made under this section shall be entered in the docket or minutes of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 382.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1008.

If the demurrer is sustained, and no amendment of the accusatory pleading is permitted, or, in case an amendment is permitted, no amendment is made or amended pleading is filed within the time fixed therefor, the action shall be dismissed, and, except as provided in Section 1010, the court must order, if the defendant is in custody, that he be discharged or if he has been admitted to bail, that his bail be exonerated, or, if money or other property has been deposited instead of bail for his appearance, that such money or other property be refunded to him or to the person or persons found by the court to have deposited such money or other property on his behalf.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1009.

An indictment, accusation or information may be amended by the district attorney, and an amended complaint may be filed by the prosecuting attorney, without leave of court at any time before the defendant pleads or a demurrer to the original pleading is sustained. The court in which an action is pending may order or permit an amendment of an indictment, accusation or information, or the filing of an amended complaint, for any defect or insufficiency, at any stage of the proceedings, or if the defect in an indictment or information be one that cannot be remedied by amendment, may order the case submitted to the same or another grand jury, or a new information to be filed. The defendant shall be required to plead to such amendment or amended pleading forthwith, or, at the time fixed for pleading, if the defendant has not yet pleaded and the trial or other proceeding shall continue as if the pleading had been originally filed as amended, unless the substantial rights of the defendant would be prejudiced thereby, in which event a reasonable postponement, not longer than the ends of justice require, may be granted. An indictment or accusation cannot be amended so as to change the offense charged, nor an information so as to charge an offense not shown by the evidence taken at the preliminary examination. A complaint cannot be amended to charge an offense not attempted to be charged by the original complaint, except that separate counts may be added which might properly have been joined in the original complaint. The amended complaint must be verified but may be verified by some person other than the one who made oath to the original complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 383.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1010.

When an indictment or information is dismissed after the sustaining of a demurrer, or at any other stage of the proceedings because of any defect or insufficiency of the indictment or information, if the court directs that the case be resubmitted to the same or another grand jury or that a new information be filed, the defendant shall not be discharged from custody, nor the defendant’s bail exonerated nor money or other property deposited instead of bail on the defendant’s behalf refunded, but the same proceedings must be had on such direction as are prescribed in Sections 997 and 998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 384.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1012.

When any of the objections mentioned in Section 1004 appears on the face of the accusatory pleading, it can be taken only by demurrer, and failure so to take it shall be deemed a waiver thereof, except that the objection to the jurisdiction of the court and the objection that the facts stated do not constitute a public offense may be taken by motion in arrest of judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Plea [1016. - 1027.]

1016.

There are six kinds of pleas to an indictment or an information, or to a complaint charging a misdemeanor or infraction:

1. Guilty.

2. Not guilty.

3. Nolo contendere, subject to the approval of the court. The court shall ascertain whether the defendant completely understands that a plea of nolo contendere shall be considered the same as a plea of guilty and that, upon a plea of nolo contendere, the court shall find the defendant guilty. The legal effect of such a plea, to a crime punishable as a felony, shall be the same as that of a plea of guilty for all purposes. In cases other than those punishable as felonies, the plea and any admissions required by the court during any inquiry it makes as to the voluntariness of, and factual basis for, the plea may not be used against the defendant as an admission in any civil suit based upon or growing out of the act upon which the criminal prosecution is based.

4. A former judgment of conviction or acquittal of the offense charged.

5. Once in jeopardy.

6. Not guilty by reason of insanity.

A defendant who does not plead guilty may enter one or more of the other pleas. A defendant who does not plead not guilty by reason of insanity shall be conclusively presumed to have been sane at the time of the commission of the offense charged; provided, that the court may for good cause shown allow a change of plea at any time before the commencement of the trial. A defendant who pleads not guilty by reason of insanity, without also pleading not guilty, thereby admits the commission of the offense charged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 385.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.2.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In Padilla v. Kentucky, 559 U.S. 356 (2010), the United States Supreme Court held that the Sixth Amendment requires defense counsel to provide affirmative and competent advice to noncitizen defendants regarding the potential immigration consequences of their criminal cases. California courts also have held that defense counsel must investigate and advise
 regarding the immigration consequences of the available dispositions, and should, when consistent with the goals of and informed consent of the defendant, and as consistent with professional standards, defend against adverse immigration consequences (People v. Soriano, 194 Cal.App.3d 1470 (1987), People v. Barocio, 216 Cal.App.3d 99 (1989),
 People v. Bautista, 115 Cal.App.4th 229 (2004)).

(b) In
 Padilla v. Kentucky, the United States Supreme Court sanctioned the consideration of immigration consequences by both parties in the plea negotiating process. The court stated that “informed consideration of possible deportation can only benefit both the State and noncitizen defendants during the plea-bargaining process. By bringing deportation consequences into this process, the defense and prosecution may well be able to reach agreements that better satisfy the interests of both parties.”

(c) In Padilla v. Kentucky, the United States Supreme Court found that for noncitizens, deportation is an integral part of the penalty imposed for
 criminal convictions. Deportation may result from serious offenses or a single minor offense. It may be by far the most serious penalty flowing from the conviction.

(d) With an accurate understanding of immigration consequences, many noncitizen defendants are able to plead to a conviction and sentence that satisfy the prosecution and court, but that have no, or fewer, adverse immigration consequences than the original charge.

(e) Defendants who are misadvised or not advised at all of the immigration consequences of criminal charges often suffer irreparable damage to their current or potential lawful immigration status, resulting in penalties such as mandatory detention, deportation, and permanent separation from close family. In some cases, these consequences could have been
 avoided had counsel provided informed advice and attempted to defend against such consequences.

(f) Once in removal proceedings, a noncitizen may be transferred to any of over 200 immigration detention facilities across the country. Many criminal offenses trigger mandatory detention, so that the person may not request bond. In immigration proceedings, there is no court-appointed right to counsel and as a result, the majority of detained immigrants go unrepresented. Immigration judges often lack the power to consider whether the person should remain in the United States in light of equitable factors such as serious hardship to United States citizen family members, length of time living in the United States, or rehabilitation.

(g) The immigration consequences of criminal
 convictions have
 a particularly strong impact in California. One out of every four persons living in the state is foreign-born. One out of every two children lives in a household headed by at least one foreign-born person. The majority of these children are United States citizens. It is estimated that 50,000 parents of California United States citizen children were deported in a little over two years. Once a person is deported, especially after a criminal conviction, it is extremely unlikely that he or she ever is permitted to return.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature to codify Padilla v. Kentucky and related California case law and to encourage the growth of such case law in furtherance of justice and the findings and declarations of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 705, Sec. 1.   (AB 1343)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.3.

(a) Defense counsel shall provide accurate and affirmative advice about the immigration consequences of a proposed disposition, and when consistent with the goals of and with the informed consent of the defendant, and consistent with professional
 standards, defend against those consequences.

(b) The prosecution, in the interests of justice, and in furtherance of the findings and declarations of Section 1016.2, shall consider the avoidance of adverse immigration consequences in the plea negotiation process as one factor in an effort to reach a just resolution.

(c) This code section shall not be interpreted to change the requirements of Section 1016.5, including the requirement that no defendant shall be required to disclose his or her immigration status to the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 705, Sec. 2.   (AB 1343)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.5.

(a) Prior to acceptance of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any offense punishable as a crime under state law, except offenses designated as infractions under state law, the court shall administer the following advisement verbatim on the record to the defendant:

If you are not a citizen of the United States, you are hereby advised that conviction of the offense for which you have been charged may have the consequences of deportation, exclusion from admission to the United States, or denial of naturalization pursuant to the laws of the United States.

(b) Upon request, the court shall allow the defendant additional time to consider the
 appropriateness of the plea in light of the advisement as described in this section. If, after January 1, 1978, the court fails to advise the defendant as required by this section and the defendant shows that conviction of the offense to which defendant pleaded guilty or nolo contendere may have the consequences for the defendant of deportation, exclusion from admission to the United States, or denial of naturalization pursuant to the laws of the United States, the court, on defendant’s motion, shall vacate the judgment and permit the defendant to withdraw the plea of guilty or nolo contendere, and enter a plea of not guilty. Absent a record that the court provided the advisement required by this section, the defendant shall be presumed not to have received the required advisement.

(c) With respect to pleas accepted prior to January 1, 1978,
 it is not the intent of the Legislature that a court’s failure to provide the advisement required by subdivision (a) of Section 1016.5 should require the vacation of judgment and withdrawal of the plea or constitute grounds for finding a prior conviction invalid. Nothing in this section, however, shall be deemed to inhibit a court, in the sound exercise of its discretion, from vacating a judgment and permitting a defendant to withdraw a plea.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that in many instances involving an individual who is not a citizen of the United States charged with an offense punishable as a crime under state law, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is entered without the defendant knowing that a conviction of such offense is grounds for deportation, exclusion from admission to the United States, or denial of
 naturalization pursuant to the laws of the United States. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to promote fairness to such accused individuals by requiring in such cases that acceptance of a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere be preceded by an appropriate warning of the special consequences for such a defendant which may result from the plea. It is also the intent of the Legislature that the court in such cases shall grant the defendant a reasonable amount of time to negotiate with the prosecuting agency in the event the defendant or the defendant’s counsel was unaware of the possibility of deportation, exclusion from admission to the United States, or denial of naturalization as a result of conviction. It is further the intent of the Legislature that at the time of the plea no defendant shall be required to disclose their legal status to the court.

(e) For a plea accepted prior to January 1, 2026, it is not the intent of the Legislature in amending this section that a court’s failure to provide a verbatim advisement as described in subdivision (a) requires the vacation of judgment and withdrawal of the plea or otherwise constitutes grounds for finding a prior conviction invalid pursuant to subdivision (b). However, this section does not inhibit a court in the exercise of its discretion, or as otherwise required by law, from vacating a judgment and permitting a defendant to withdraw a plea as otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 666, Sec. 1.   (SB 281)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.7.

(a) In the interest of justice, and in order to reach a just resolution during plea negotiations, the prosecutor shall consider during plea negotiations, among other factors, the following circumstances as factors in support of a mitigated sentence if any of the following were a contributing factor in the commission of the alleged offense:

(1) The person has experienced psychological, physical, or childhood trauma, including, but not limited to, abuse, neglect, exploitation, or sexual violence.

(2) The person is a youth, or was a youth at the time of the commission of the offense.

(3) Prior to the instant offense, or during the commission of the offense, the person is or was a victim of intimate partner violence or human trafficking.

(b) A “youth” for purposes of this section includes any person under 26 years of age on the date the offense was committed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 695, Sec. 4.   (AB 124)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1016.8.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The California Supreme Court held in Doe v. Harris (2013) 57 Cal.4th 64 that, as a general rule, plea agreements are deemed to incorporate the reserve power of the state to amend the law or enact additional laws for the public good and in pursuance of public policy. That the parties enter into a plea agreement does not have the effect of insulating them from changes in the law that the Legislature has intended to apply to
 them.
